District of Columbia statutes.
38-911

Restriction on use of appropriations.

No funds appropriated for the government of the District of Columbia may be used:

(1)

To provide transportation for students enrolled in the public schools of the District of Columbia if the transportation is provided solely to change the racial balance in any public school in the District of Columbia; or

(2)

For the cost of education (including the cost of transportation) of any individual in an elementary or secondary school located outside the District of Columbia, except:

(A)

Any individual with a disability for whom education facilities do not exist in the public school system of the District of Columbia; and

(B)

Any individual under the care, custody, or guardianship of the District of Columbia placed in a foster home or in an institution located outside the District of Columbia.

History

Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 615, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 401
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 52, 53 DCR 6198

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2211.
1973 Ed., § 31-1118.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-305, in par. (2)(A), substituted “individual with a disability” for “handicapped individual”.